Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5943.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-23-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-23 entitled "Holiday
Business" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-23-2. Licenses for holiday business.
(a) A retail establishment may be open on any day of the year except as specifically
prohibited herein. A retail establishment shall not be open on a holiday unless licensed by the
appropriate town council pursuant to this section. The city or town council of any city or town shall
grant holiday licenses for the sale by retail establishments. No license shall be issued on December
25 of any year or on Thanksgiving Day, except to:
(1) Pharmacies licensed under chapter 19.1 of this title; provided, however, that no drug
(as defined in § 5-19.1-2) or controlled substance (as defined in § 5-19.1-2) requiring a prescription
(as defined in § 5-19.1-2) shall be dispensed or sold unless a licensed pharmacist-in-charge (as
defined in § 5-19.1-2) is available on the premises;
(2) Retail establishments that principally sell food products as defined in § 44-18-30(9) and
that employ fewer than six (6) employees per shift at any one location;
(3) Retail establishments principally engaged in the sale of cut flowers, floral products,
plants, shrubs, trees, fertilizers, seeds, bulbs, and garden accessories;
(4) Retail establishments principally engaged in the sale and/or rental of video cassette
tapes; and
(5) Retail establishments principally engaged in the preparation or sale of bakery products.

(b) Retail establishments licensed pursuant to this section may be permitted to open for
business during holidays on their normal business working hours.
(c) Retail establishments licensed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the
provisions of chapter 1 of title 25, entitled “Holidays and Days of Special Observance,” and those
establishments may sell any and all items sold in the ordinary course of business with the exception
of alcoholic beverages.
(d) All employees engaged in work during Sundays or holidays pursuant to the provisions
of this section shall receive from their employer no less than time and a half for the work so
performed and shall be guaranteed at least a minimum of four (4) hours employment; except those
employees referred to in § 28-12-4.3(a)(4), provided that the work performed by the employee is
strictly voluntary and refusal to work for any retail establishment on a Sunday or holiday is not a
ground for discrimination, dismissal, or discharge or any other penalty upon the employee;
provided that, the provisions of this section shall only apply to retail establishments with fifteen
(15) or more employees; and provided, further that, the provisions of this section shall not apply to
any individual covered by a collective bargaining agreement or employment contract. The city or
town council may fix and cause to be paid into the city or town treasury for each license issued
pursuant to this section a fee not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) and may fix the
time or times when the license granted terminates; provided, that the city or town council shall not
charge a licensing fee to any charitable, benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, patriotic,
social service, civic, fraternal, police, fire, labor, or religious organization that is not operated for
profit.
(e) Retail establishments engaged principally in the preparation or sale of bakery products
and pharmacies shall be licensed prior to the sale of those products in accordance with this section;
provided, that the time and one half and voluntary work provisions do not apply.
(f) Each city or town council shall fix, limit, and specify those rules, regulations, and
conditions relating to the granting, holding, and exercising those licenses as it deems necessary or
advisable and as are not inconsistent with law, and may suspend or revoke any license granted by
it for more than two (2) violations of those rules, regulations, and conditions during a calendar year.
(g) Each city or town shall grant Class A licenses authorizing retail establishments that sell
alcoholic beverages for consumption off of the premises within its jurisdiction to sell on Sundays,
alcoholic beverages in accordance with the terms of this chapter and that of title 3; provided that it
shall not permit such sale prior to the hour of twelve noon (12:00 p.m.) or on Christmas day, if
Christmas shall occur on a Sunday; provided, further, that no employee shall be required to work
and refusal to work on a Sunday shall not be the grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge,
LC002045 - Page 2 of 4

deduction of hours, or any other penalty.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002045
========
LC002045 - Page 3 of 4